hw_foma/serbian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +inf +1.Sing +2.Sing +3.Sing +1.Pl +2.Pl +3.Pl

LEXICON Root

stanova Conj;
posechiva Conj;
poseschat Conj;
bolet Conj;
verova Conj;
verit Conj;
dopisiva Conj;
perepisivat Conj;
doputova Conj;
priehat Conj;
doruchkova Conj;
zavtrakat Conj;
skuchat Conj;
dochekiva Conj;
vstrechat Conj;
dozivlava Conj;
perenosit Conj;


LEXICON Conj

+inf:^ti #;
+1.Sg:^em #;
+2.Sg:^esh #;
+3.Sg:^e #;
+1.Pl:^emo #;
+2.Pl:^ete #;
+3.Pl:^u #;
